Utah statutes.
32A-1-602.   General restrictions on attire and conduct.
The following attire and conduct on a premises or at an event regulated by the
commission under this title are considered contrary to the public health,
peace, safety, welfare, and morals, and are prohibited:
(1)  employing or using a person in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages
while the person is in:
(a)  a state of nudity;
(b)  a state of seminudity; or
(c)  attire, costume, or clothing that exposes to view any portion of:
(i)  the female breast below the top of the areola; or
(ii)  the cleft of the buttocks;
(2)  employing or using the services of a person to mingle with patrons while
the person is in:
(a)  a state of nudity;
(b)  a state of seminudity; or
(c)  attire, costume, or clothing that exposes to view any portion of:
(i)  the female breast below the top of the areola; or
(ii)  the cleft of the buttocks;
(3)  encouraging or permitting a person to:
(a)  engage in or simulate an act of:
(i)  sexual intercourse;
(ii)  masturbation;
(iii)  sodomy;
(iv)  bestiality;
(v)  oral copulation;
(vi)  flagellation; or
(vii)  a sexual act that is prohibited by Utah law; or
(b)  touch, caress, or fondle the breast, buttocks, anus, or genitals of any
other person;
(4)  permitting a person to wear or use a device or covering that:
(a)  is exposed to view; and
(b)  simulates all or any portion of the human genitals, anus, pubic area, or
female breast;
(5)  permitting a person to use an artificial device or inanimate object to
depict an act prohibited by this section;
(6)  permitting a person to remain on a premises or at an event who exposes to
public view any portion of that person's:
(a)  genitals, pubic area, or anus; or
(b)  in the case of a female, the areola and nipple of the breast; or
(7)  showing a film, still picture, electronic reproduction, or other visual
reproduction depicting:
(a)  an act or simulated act of:
(i)  sexual intercourse;
(ii)  masturbation;
(iii)  sodomy;
(iv)  bestiality;
(v)  oral copulation;
(vi)  flagellation; or
(vii)  a sexual act that is prohibited by Utah law;
(b)  a person being touched, caressed, or fondled on the breast, buttocks,
anus, or genitals;
(c)  a scene wherein an artificial device or inanimate object is employed to
depict, or a drawing is employed to portray, an act prohibited by this
section; or
(d)  a scene wherein a person displays the genitals or anus.
